Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202284-1619
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Direct Primary Care Pilot Program Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Administrative Services;

(2) Direct primary care health plan means a health plan which includes primary care services provided by a participating provider, pharmaceutical care as defined in section 38-2831 provided by a licensed pharmacist, and health care coverage for medical specialists, hospitals, pharmacy, and other medical coverage the department deems appropriate;

(3) Direct provider has the same meaning as in section 71-9503;

(4) Enrollee means a state employee or his or her dependent who is enrolled in the pilot program;

(5) Nebraska State Insurance Program means the health insurance offered to state employees and their dependents under sections 84-1601 to 84-1615;

(6) Participating provider means a direct provider who is participating in the pilot program;

(7) Pilot program means the Direct Primary Care Pilot Program established under the Direct Primary Care Pilot Program Act;

(8) Plan administrator means the entity with which the department contracts to administer the direct primary care health plan;

(9) Primary care has the same meaning as in section 71-9503; and

(10) State employee means an employee participating in the Nebraska State Insurance Program.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 2.